Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB647.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5902(a.1)(4), (c)(1) and (e.1)(4) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended and the section is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 5902. Prostitution and related offenses.* * *(a.1) Grading of offenses under subsection (a).--An offense under subsection (a) constitutes a:* * *[(4) Felony of the third degree if the person who committed the offense knew that he or she was human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) positive or manifesting acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS).]* * *123456789101112131415161718 (c) Grading of offenses under subsection (b).--(1) An offense under subsection (b) constitutes a felony of the third degree if:(i) the offense falls within paragraphs (b)(1), (b)(2) or (b)(3);(ii) the actor compels another to engage in or promote prostitution; or(iv) the actor promotes prostitution of his spouse, child, ward or any person for whose care, protection or support he is responsible.[; or(v) the person knowingly promoted prostitution of another who was HIV positive or infected with the AIDS virus.]* * *(e.1) Grading of offenses under subsection (e).--An offense under subsection (e) constitutes a:* * *[(4) Felony of the third degree if the person who committed the offense knew that he or she was human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) positive or manifesting acquired immune deficiency syndrome (AIDS).]* * *(e.3) Resentencing.--(1) Upon a petition to the court of common pleas that originally entered an order of sentence, a person convicted and sentenced under the former subsection (a.1)(4), (c)(1)(v) or (e.1)(4) and to which the following apply may be resentenced to a misdemeanor grade as provided under subsection (a.1), (c) or (e.1) based on the established facts as determined by the court at the time of conviction:20250SB0647PN0659 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) The person has completed the sentence and any ordered supervision.(ii) The person is not currently serving a sentence or under supervision on any other matter.(2) Upon a petition to the court of common pleas that originally entered an order of sentence, a person convicted and sentenced under the former subsection (a.1)(4), (c)(1)(v) or (e.1)(4) who is currently serving the imposed sentence or under supervision as part of the imposed sentence shall be resentenced to a misdemeanor grade as provided under subsection (a.1), (c) or (e.1) based on the established facts as determined by the court at the time of conviction.(3) Any modification of sentence under paragraph (1) or (2) shall not exceed the original sentence imposed by the court.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0647PN0659 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617